Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
BOARD OF TRUSTEES

§87A-5 Composition of board. [See
explanatory note below.] The board of trustees of the employer-union
health benefits trust fund shall consist of ten trustees appointed by the
governor in accordance with the following procedure:

(1) Five trustees, one of whom shall represent
retirees, to represent employee-beneficiaries and to be selected as follows:

(A) Three trustees shall be appointed from a
list of two nominees per trustee selected by each of the three exclusive representative
organizations that have the largest number of employee-beneficiaries;

(B) One trustee shall be appointed from a
list of two nominees selected by mutual agreement of the remaining exclusive
employee representative organizations; and

(C) One trustee representing retirees shall
be appointed from a list of two nominees selected by mutual agreement of all
eligible exclusive representatives; and

(2) Five trustees to represent public employers.

Section 26-34 shall not apply to board member
selection and terms. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no
exclusive representative of a bargaining unit that sponsors or participates in
a voluntary employee beneficiary association shall be eligible to select
nominees or to be represented by a trustee on the board.

As used in this section, the term
"exclusive representative" shall have the same meaning as in section
89-2. [L 2001, c 88, pt of §1; am L 2005, c 250, §1]

Explanatory Note

L 2005, c 250
amendment. The legislature concluded that the governor's proclamation
indicating the governor's intent to return H.B. No. 1548 was constitutionally
defective and that said measure became law. On July 13, 2005, the legislature
assigned Act 250 to H.B. No. 1548. The attorney general has taken the position
that H.B. No. 1548 did not become law.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next